Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 4. Assessments and Bonds Generally
§ 15-6-414.
Assessments; liability of treasurer for error.

If the treasurer receives any monies for assessments, giving a receipt therefor, for any property and afterward returns it as unpaid, or receives any money after making the return, and the property is sold for assessment which has been so paid and receipted for by him, his clerk, assistant or deputy, he and his bond are liable to the holder of the certificate given to the purchaser at the sale for the amount of the face of the certificate and legal interest which shall be demanded within two (2) years from the date of sale and recovered in any court of competent jurisdiction. No city or town is liable to the holder of any certificate.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 358; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-358; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

§ 15-6-415.
Assessments; record of payment or redemption.

If the amount of any assessment, with interest, penalty, costs and charges accrued thereon is paid to the treasurer before the sale of any property, he shall mark it paid with the date of payment on the assessment roll. If any property sold for any assessments is redeemed, the treasurer shall enter it with the date of redemption on the roll. The records shall be made on the margin of the roll opposite the description of the property.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 359; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-359; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-416.
Assessments; property held in trust; creation and discharge thereof.

If any property is bid in by or stricken off to any city or town under any proceeding of this chapter, the property shall be held in trust by the city or town for the fund of the improvement district for which the assessment was levied to the extent of the assessment or installment for which the property was sold, with penalty, accrued interest and interest on the installment to time of next call for bonds or warrants. The city or town, at any time after receiving a deed, may pay the fund the amount of the delinquent assessment for which the property was sold and all accrued interest and interest to the time of the next call for bonds or warrants issued against the assessment fund at the rate provided, and thereupon take and hold the property discharged of the trust.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 360; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-360; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

§ 15-6-417.
Assessments; property held in trust; sale thereof; procedure; notice.

Any city or town, at any time after the period of redemption has expired and deeds have been issued to the city or town by virtue of any proceedings under this chapter, may sell any such property at public auction to the highest bidder for cash. No bid may be accepted for any amount less than the amount set forth in the deed, plus accrued interest to date of sale, computed on the assessment for which the property was sold from the date of the execution of the deed, and all delinquent assessments and taxes against the property with accrued interest, penalties, costs and other charges. The city or town shall pay into the fund for which the property was held in trust an amount necessary to fully cancel the assessment for which the property was sold, together with all interest thereon.

Any such sale shall be conducted only after notice describing the property has been given and stating that the city treasurer, on the day specified, will sell the property at the front door of the building in which the governing body holds its sessions, between the hours of 10:00 a.m. and 4:00 p.m., and continue the sale from day to day, or withdraw the property from sale after the first day if he deems that the interests of the city or town so require. The notice shall be published at least five (5) times in a daily newspaper published within the city or town, or if there is none, then at least twice in any newspaper of general circulation in the county. At least fifteen (15) days shall elapse between the date of the last publication of the notice and the day the property is sold.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 361; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-361; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

No priorities between liens. —

Liens of special assessments levied to pay bonds issued for special improvements, such as grading, paving and sewer, have no priority one over the other, but are of equal rank regardless of the time when they were created. Willard v. Morton, 50 Wyo. 72, 59 P.2d 338,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1936).

§ 15-6-418.
Assessments; redemption of sold property; procedure; notice; deed; results therefrom.

Any property sold for an assessment is subject to redemption by the former owner, or his grantee, mortgagee, heir or other representative at any time within two (2) years from the date of the sale, upon the payment to the treasurer for the purchaser of the amount for which the property was sold, with interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per year, together with all taxes and special assessments, interest, penalties, costs and other charges thereon paid by the purchaser at or since the sale, with like interest thereon. Unless written notice of taxes and assessments subsequently paid, and the amount thereof, is deposited with the city or town treasurer, property may be redeemed without their inclusion. On any redemption, the treasurer shall give to the redemptioner a certificate of redemption and pay over the amount received to the purchaser of the certificate of sale or his assigns. If property is not redeemed within the period of two (2) years, the treasurer, on demand of the purchaser or his assigns and the surrender to him of the certificate of sale, shall execute a deed for the property to the purchaser or his assigns. No deed may be executed until the holder of the certificate of sale has notified the owners of the property that he holds the certificate and that he will demand a deed therefor. The notice shall be given by personal service upon the owners. If the owners are nonresidents of the state or cannot be found within the state after diligent search, the notice may be given by publication in a newspaper of general circulation within the city or town once a week for three (3) successive weeks. The notice and return thereof, with the affidavit of the person, or in case of a city or town, of the comptroller or clerk, claiming a deed, showing that service was made, shall be filed with the treasurer. If property is not redeemed within sixty (60) days after the date of service, or the date of the first publication of the notice, the holder of the certificate of sale is entitled to a deed. The deed shall be executed only for the property described in the certificate, and after payment of all delinquent taxes and special assessments, or installments and certificates of delinquency or other certificates issued for special or local assessments, whether levied, assessed or issued before or after the issuance of the certificates of sale. Any deed may be issued to any city or town for the face amount of the certificate of sale, plus accrued interest, costs, penalties and charges, and be held by the city or town subject to the liens of general taxes and special assessments.

The deed shall be:

Executed in the name of the city or town by which the improvement was made and shall recite in substance:

The matters contained in the certificate of sale;

The notice to the owner; and

That no redemption has been made of the property within the time allowed by law.

The deed shall be signed and acknowledged by the city or town treasurer and is prima facie evidence that:

The property was assessed according to law;

The property was not redeemed;

Due notice of demand for deed had been given; and

The person executing the deed was the proper officer.

The deed is conclusive evidence of the regularity of all other proceedings from the assessment, up to and including the execution of the deed, and shall convey the entire fee simple title to the property described, except as otherwise provided for cities and towns, stripped of all liens and claims except assessments for local improvements or installments thereof not delinquent.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 362; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-362; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

The 2006 amendment,

redesignated (b)(ii) as (c); and redesignated the remaining subsection accordingly; added “The deed shall be” in (c), and made related changes.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Applicability. —

The redemption of property sold to pay delinquent assessments is controlled by this section. Collier v. Hilltop Nat'l Bank, 920 P.2d 1241,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1996).

§ 15-6-419.
Assessments; foreclosure action for delinquency.

Any city or town may proceed with the collection or enforcement of any delinquent assessment or delinquent installment in an action brought in its own name in the district court in the county in which the city or town is located. It is not necessary to bring a separate suit for each piece or parcel of property delinquent, but all or any part of the property delinquent under any single assessment roll or assessment district may be proceeded against in the same action. Any of the owners or persons interested in any of the property may be joined as parties defendant in the action to foreclose, and any liens for delinquent assessments or installments may be foreclosed in the proceeding. The proceeding shall be tried before the court without a jury. In any such proceeding, it is sufficient to allege the passage of the ordinance providing for the improvement, the making of the improvement, the levying of the improvement assessment, the confirmation thereof, the date of delinquency of the assessment or installment and that the assessment was not paid prior to the delinquency or at all. The assessment roll and confirmatory order or authenticated copies are prima facie evidence of the regularity and legality of the proceedings connected therewith, and the burden of proof is upon the defendants. In any action where the owners or parties interested in any particular lot, tract or parcel of land or other property included in the suit suffer a default, the court may enter judgment of foreclosure and sale as to those parties and property and order execution thereon, and the action may proceed as to the remaining defendants and property. The judgment of the court shall specify separately the amount of the assessment or installment, with interest, penalty and costs, chargeable to the several lots, tracts and parcels of land and other property in the proceedings. The judgment has the effect of a separate judgment, and any appeal shall not invalidate or delay it except as to the property which is the subject of the appeal. In entering judgment the court shall decree that such lots, tracts or parcels of land or other property be sold to enforce the judgment and execution shall issue for the enforcement of the decree. Judgment may be entered as to any one (1) or more lots, tracts or parcels of land or other property involved, and the court may retain jurisdiction of the case as to the balance. All proceedings supplemental to judgment, including appeal, order of sale, period of redemption, sale and the issuance of deed shall be conducted in accordance with the law relating to property sold upon foreclosure of real estate mortgages.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 363; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-363; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Judgment on bonds where assessment held invalid. —

Where holder of local improvement bonds brought suit against abutting property owners to enforce special assessments and called upon city to become a party to that action, which was refused, assessments being invalid, he was not obliged to bring mandamus to compel the city officials to reassess, but was entitled to personal judgment against city for the sum due on the bonds. Henning v. Casper, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1936).

City not bound by judgment of invalidity. —

City not being party to action in which assessments were held invalid is not bound by the judgment and may therefore, under provisions of this section, enforce the assessments by a proceeding in court, or may make reassessment within time limited. Henning v. Casper, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1936).

§ 15-6-420.
Assessments; enforcement of installment liens.

If the assessment upon property is payable in installments, the enforcement of the lien of any installment by any method authorized in this chapter does not prevent the enforcement of the lien of any subsequent installment when it becomes delinquent. Any city or town may provide by ordinance that upon failure to pay any installment when due, the entire assessment is due and payable and the collection enforced in the manner prescribed.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 364; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-364; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

No priorities between liens. —

Liens of special assessments levied to pay bonds issued for special improvements, such as grading, paving and sewer, have no priority one over the other, but are of equal rank regardless of time when they were created. Willard v. Morton, 50 Wyo. 72, 59 P.2d 338,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1936).

§ 15-6-421.
Assessments; certificates of delinquency; issuance, sale; evidence therefrom; restriction.

Any city or town, by ordinance, may provide for the issuance of certificates of delinquency for any delinquent assessment or installment and any penalty and interest thereon to date of issuance. The certificates of delinquency constitute a lien against the property upon which assessments were levied. They shall bear interest from the date of issuance at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per year and may be foreclosed after two (2) years from the date of their issuance in the same manner and with the same effect as mortgages upon real estate are foreclosed.

The certificates may be:

Issued to the city or town;

Sold to any person applying for them;

Assigned in writing, and the city or town may sell and assign any certificates issued to it upon the payment, in cash of the principal and accrued interest.

A certificate is prima facie evidence that:

The land against which it was issued was subject to the assessment at the time assessed;

The property was assessed as required by law; and

The assessment or installment was not paid prior to the issuance of the certificate.

No certificate of delinquency may be issued upon any property for any assessment or installment during the pendency of any proceedings in court affecting the assessment or installment thereof.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 365; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-365; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

§ 15-6-422.
Assessments; omitted property; when assessed; resolution; notice and hearing; results therefrom.

If for any reason property otherwise subject to assessment has been omitted from the assessment roll, the governing body, upon its own motion or upon the application of the owner of any property within the assessment district, may assess it according to the special benefits accruing to the omitted property because of the improvement and in proportion to the assessments levied upon other property within the district.

In any such case, the governing body shall first pass a resolution:

Setting forth that certain described property was omitted from the assessment;

Notifying all persons who may desire to object to appear at a meeting of the governing body at a time specified in the resolution; and

Directing the proper board, officer or authority to report at or prior to the hearing the amount which should be borne by each lot, tract or parcel of land or other property omitted.

The resolution shall be mailed and published in the manner provided for the giving of notice in W.S.

15-6-202

.

After the hearing, the governing body shall consider the matter as though the property had been included upon the original roll and may confirm all or any portion thereof by ordinance. The roll of omitted property shall then be certified to the treasurer for collection in the same manner as other assessments.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 366; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-366; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-423.
Assessments; fees.

The city or town treasurer shall charge fifty cents ($.50) for the issuance of each certificate of sale and each certificate of delinquency and one dollar ($1.00) for each deed.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 367; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-367; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-424.
Assessments; purchaser's lien; interest.

The purchaser at any sale authorized in this chapter acquires a lien on the property bid in by him for the amount paid plus all taxes and delinquent assessments, or delinquency and all interest, penalties, costs and charges he paid thereon whether levied before or after the sale for state, county, city or town purposes. The purchaser is entitled to interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per year on the original amount he paid from the date of the sale and upon subsequent payments from the date of payment of the respective amounts.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 368; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-368; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

No priorities between liens. —

Liens of special assessments levied to pay bonds issued for special improvements, such as grading, paving, sewer, etc., have no priority one over the other, but are of equal rank regardless of time when they were created. Willard v. Morton, 50 Wyo. 72, 59 P.2d 338,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1936).

Setting aside sale to enforce lien of city. —

Where petition in action to set aside sale of realty pursuant to decree in suit to foreclose city's lien for street improvements sets forth facts which would have produced materially different result in foreclosure suit, it sets out meritorious defense authorizing setting aside of sale. Elstermeyer v. Cheyenne, 57 Wyo. 256, 116 P.2d 231,

1941 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1941), reh'g denied, 57 Wyo. 421, 120 P.2d 599,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1942).

§ 15-6-425.
Assessments; general tax certificates subject thereto; foreclosure; interest.

The holder of any certificate of sale or delinquency for general taxes, before commencing any action to foreclose the lien, shall:

Pay in full all local assessments or installments outstanding against the whole or any portion of the property included in the certificate; or

Proceed to acquire title to the property subject to certain or all local assessment liens thereon, in which case the complaint, decree of foreclosure, order of sale, sale, certificate of sale and deed shall so state.

If the holder pays the local assessments, he is entitled to twelve percent (12%) interest per year on that amount from the date of payment.

In any action to foreclose a lien for general taxes upon any property, a copy of the complaint shall be served on the treasurer of the city or town in which the property is located within five (5) days after it is filed. If any property is struck off to or bid in by the county at any sale for general taxes, and the property is subsequently sold by the county, the proceeds of the sale shall first be applied to discharge in full the lien or liens for general taxes for which the property was sold. The remaining proceeds, or the amount necessary, shall be paid to the city or town to discharge all local assessment liens upon the property. Any surplus shall be distributed among the proper county funds.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 369; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-369; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-426.
Assessments; limitation of actions.

An action to collect any special assessment or installment for local improvements of any kind, or to enforce the lien of any such assessment or installment, whether brought by a city or town or by the holder of any certificate of delinquency, or by any other person having the right to bring the action, shall be commenced within ten (10) years after the assessment becomes delinquent, or within ten (10) years after the last installment becomes delinquent.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 370; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-370; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Section applies to bondholders' right of action. —

This section fixes the time within which the right of action created by §

15-6-433

, relative to the remedy of local improvement bondholders, must be brought. Guernsey v. Casper, 67 Wyo. 473, 226 P.2d 523,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1951) (decided under former similar provisions).

§ 15-6-427.
Reassessments; when authorized or required; property included.

If any special assessment for local improvements is invalid in whole or in part for any reason, the governing body may reassess the assessments and enforce their collection in accordance with the provisions of law and ordinance existing at the time the reassessment is made. If for any reason the amount assessed is insufficient to pay the cost and expense of the improvement made and enjoyed by the owners of property in the assessment district, the governing body shall reassess all property in the assessment district to pay for the improvement. The assessment shall be made according to the provisions of law and ordinance existing at the time of its levy. Any city or town may assess or reassess all property which the governing body finds to be specially benefited to pay the whole or any portion of the cost and expense of any local improvement whether or not the property so assessed or reassessed abuts upon, is adjacent to, or proximate to the improvement, or was included in the original assessment district. The right to assess all property found to be specially benefited also applies to any supplemental assessment or reassessment which the city or town finds necessary to provide for any deficiency in any local improvement district fund caused by the invalidity of any portion of the original assessment in the improvement district, or if for any cause the amount originally assessed is insufficient to pay the cost of the improvement.

If any assessment or reassessment for any local improvement is declared void and its enforcement refused by any court, or for any cause is set aside, annulled or declared void by any court, either directly or by virtue of any decision of the court, the governing body shall assess or reassess the property which has been or will be benefited by the local improvement, based upon its actual cost at the time of its completion.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 371; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-371; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Remedy of owner of bonds payable only from improvement fund upon nonpayment

is to enforce a special assessment by mandamus to compel city officials to reassess. Blanchar v. Casper, 81 F.2d 452, 1936 U.S. App. LEXIS 3462 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1936).

City not bound by judgment where not party to action. —

City not party to action in which sewer assessments were declared invalid is not bound by the judgment and may enforce the assessments by a proceeding in court, or may make a reassessment within the time limited. Henning v. Casper, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1936).

Limitation of actions. —

In mandamus action by holders of special assessment bonds to compel mayor and city council to make reassessment to cover deficiency in original assessment, where a railroad had contested inclusion of its right-of-way, and controversy between railroad and city was not terminated until agreed settlement was perfected by dismissal of its appeal, when only then did it become determinable what the deficiency was, action thereafter was well within the limit within which reassessment must be made. Cowan v. State, 55 Wyo. 427, 100 P.2d 427,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1940).

Mandamus action preserves bondholders' right until final judgment.—

In mandamus action by holders of special assessment bonds to compel mayor and city council to make reassessment to cover deficiency in original assessment, both the written demand and the filing of the suit having been well within the time limited by statute, the general rule is that such action preserves the right until final judgment. Cowan v. State, 55 Wyo. 427, 100 P.2d 427,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1940).

§ 15-6-428.
Reassessments; ordinance; roll; effect of contracts or irregularities; limitation; payment.

The governing body of any city or town shall proceed with any assessment authorized by W.S.

15-6-427

by ordinance so ordering and directing the preparation of an assessment roll. The roll may include any property specially benefited by the improvement, whether or not it was included in the original assessment district. When assessed the additional property becomes a part of the local improvement district, and all payments of assessments shall be paid into the local improvement fund to pay for the improvement.

The fact that the contract has been let or that the improvement has been made and computed in whole or in part does not prevent the making of the assessment. The omission, failure or neglect of an officer to comply with the provisions of law or ordinance of the city or town, as to any matter connected with the improvement and the first assessment thereof does not invalidate or in any other way affect the making of any assessment authorized by W.S.

15-6-427

. However, the assessment shall not exceed the actual cost and expense of the improvement, together with the accrued interest thereon, and the cost of the reassessment. It is the intent of this chapter to make the cost and expense of local improvements payable by the property specially benefited thereby, notwithstanding that the proceedings of the governing body, board of public works or other board, officers or authority of the city or town may be found irregular or defective, whether jurisdictional or otherwise. When the assessment is completed, all sums paid on the former attempted assessment shall be credited to the property for which they were paid.

If any property within the original local improvement district is not affected by any assessment authorized by W.S.

15-6-427

, it need not be entered upon the assessment roll.

After certification of the roll to the treasurer of the city or town for collection, the same time for payment of assessments, without the imposition of any penalties or interest, and the notice that the assessments are in the hands of the treasurer for collection, shall be given as in the case of an original assessment. After delinquency the penalty and interest shall be charged as on original assessment. If the original assessment was payable in installments, the new assessment, after delinquency, may be divided into equal installments and made payable as the governing body may prescribe in the ordinance ordering the new assessment.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 372; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-372; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-429.
Reassessments; assessment provisions applicable.

The provisions of original assessments relating to the filing of assessment rolls, the time, place, notice and conduct of hearing, the confirmation of the roll, the time when assessments become a lien upon the property assessed, the proceedings on appeal from any assessment, the method of collecting assessments and all proceedings for enforcing the lien shall be conducted in the same manner for assessment authorized by W.S.

15-6-427

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 373; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-373; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-6-430.
Reassessments or supplemental assessments; time limitations; use of fund.

No city or town shall proceed with any reassessment or supplemental assessment unless the ordinance ordering it is passed by the governing body within:

Three (3) years from the time the original assessment for the improvement was held to be invalid, insufficient or for any cause set aside, in whole or in part, or held void or its enforcement denied directly or indirectly by the courts; or

In the case of supplemental assessments within three (3) years from the time it was determined that the total amount of the valid assessments levied and assessed on account of any improvement was insufficient to pay the whole or that portion of the cost and expense to be paid by special assessment.

If the amount collected by assessment is insufficient to pay the cost of the improvement, the governing body may authorize the payment of the deficit out of the permanent improvement fund.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 374, 375; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-374, 15.1-375; W.S. 1977, §§

15-6-430

,

15-6-431

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Provision construed as directory. —

This section must be considered in light of other provisions, showing legislative intention that bonds shall be payable only from the assessment against the improved property, as making it the duty of the city to carry out that intention, and should be construed as directory as to time of performance, if that is necessary to carry out the purpose of the statute. Cowan v. State, 55 Wyo. 427, 100 P.2d 427,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1940) (decided under former law).

Limitation affected by prior contest. —

In mandamus action by holders of special assessment bonds to compel mayor and city council to make reassessment to cover deficiency in original assessment, where a railroad had contested inclusion of its right-of-way, and controversy between railroad and the city was not terminated until the agreed settlement was perfected by dismissal of its appeal, when only then did it become determinable what the deficiency was, action thereafter was well within the limit within which reassessment must be made. Cowan v. State, 55 Wyo. 427, 100 P.2d 427,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1940).

Timely mandamus action preserves right. —

In mandamus action by holders of special assessment bonds to compel mayor and city council to make reassessment to cover deficiency in original assessment, both written demand and filing of suit having been well within the time limited by statute, the general rule is that such action preserves the right until final judgment. Cowan v. State, 55 Wyo. 427, 100 P.2d 427,

1940 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1940).

Personal judgment against city where assessment held invalid.—

Where the holder of local improvement bonds brought suit against abutting property owners to enforce special assessments, and called upon the city to become a party to that action, which was refused, assessments being held invalid, he was not obliged to bring mandamus to compel the city officials to reassess, but was entitled to personal judgment against city for sum due on the bonds. Henning v. Casper, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1936).

City not bound by judgment of invalidity of assessment. —

City not being a party to action in which assessments were declared invalid is not bound by the judgment, and it may enforce assessments by a proceeding in court, or may make reassessments within the time limited. Henning v. Casper, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1936).

§ 15-6-431.
Bonds; authorization; general requirements; signatures; limitation on amount.

The governing body of any city or town may provide by ordinance for the issuance of bonds for the payment of the whole or any portion of the cost and expense of any local improvements as provided in this chapter.

The bonds authorized in subsection (a) of this section:

May be issued to the contractor, or be issued and sold as otherwise provided;

Shall be issued only pursuant to ordinance;

By their terms shall be made payable on or before a date not more than fifteen (15) years from the date of issuance;

Shall bear interest as provided in the ordinance payable annually or semiannually at a rate not to exceed twelve percent (12%);

Shall be in the denominations provided in the ordinance and be numbered in each series consecutively from one (1) upwards;

May be refunded under W.S.

16-5-101

through

16-5-119

;

May be payable in any place within or without the state including the office of the state treasurer.

Each bond shall:

Have interest coupons attached for each payment;

Have the seal of the city or town affixed to it and refer to the improvement for which issued and the ordinance ordering its issuance;

Provide that the principal and interest is payable out of the local improvement fund created for the payment of the cost and expense of the improvement and not otherwise.

Each bond and coupon shall be signed by the mayor, countersigned by the treasurer and attested by the clerk or comptroller. Printed facsimile signatures of those officers may be used on the coupons.

No bonds may be issued in any amount in excess of the cost and expense of the improvement.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 376; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-376; 1971, ch. 254, § 4; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-432

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1; 1983, ch. 168, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to funding and refunding of bonds generally, see §§

15-8-101

to

15-8-106

.

As to interest rates generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

Limit on amount. —

Assessments are limited to costs and expenses of the improvement, and bonds are apparently authorized to be issued in the same amount, though not greater, and the city is not liable for deficiency subsequently arising. Richardson v. Casper, 48 Wyo. 219, 45 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1935).

City not liable for failure to collect assessments. —

City is not liable in tort for its failure to make any effort to collect special assessments levied to pay special improvement bonds, as law gives the bondholder the right to collect such assessments. Richardson v. Casper, 48 Wyo. 219, 45 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1935).

In tort action against city for failure to perform its alleged duties in collecting and applying special assessments to the payment of special improvement bonds, city was not liable as bonds contained statutory limitation of liability and gave holders the right to enforce the assessments, no duty being imposed upon the city to collect and apply the special assessments. Richardson v. Casper, 48 Wyo. 219, 45 P.2d 1,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1935).

If city and its officials fulfill their duty in connection with special assessments, nothing further can be expected of them; the contract between the parties, or the statute limiting liability, must then govern, and city is relieved from any liability even though there be a deficiency in the amount collectible. Henning v. Casper, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1936).

Remedy of owner of bonds payable only from improvement fund upon nonpayment

is to enforce a special assessment by mandamus to compel city officials to reassess. Blanchar v. Casper, 81 F.2d 452, 1936 U.S. App. LEXIS 3462 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1936).

Municipality liable for refusal to make assessments. —

When a municipality has power to make local improvements and pay therefor out of its general fund or by assessments against abutting property, and takes the latter course, but neglects or refuses unreasonably to make valid assessments, by reason of which certificates or bonds issued in payment are rendered valueless, municipality must respond in damages, even though it is agreed between the parties that they shall be paid out of the assessments. Henning v. Casper, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1936).

Judgment against city where assessments held invalid. —

Where holder of local improvement bonds brought suit against abutting property owners to enforce special assessments and called upon the city to become party to that action, which was refused, and where assessments were held invalid, he was not obliged to bring mandamus to compel city officials to reassess, but entitled to personal judgment against city for the sum due on the bonds. Henning v. Casper, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 50 Wyo. 1, 57 P.2d 1264,

1936 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1936).

§ 15-6-432.
Bonds; cost assessment; payments; interest.

If any city or town issues bonds to pay the cost and expense of any local improvement, the cost and expense shall be assessed against the lots, tracts and parcels of land and other property liable. The ordinance levying the assessment shall provide that the sum charged against each may be paid during the thirty (30) day period as provided in W.S.

15-6-439

, unless the legal owners of record of all property assessed in the district waive that thirty (30) day period. The ordinance levying the assessment shall specify whether the sum remaining unpaid is payable in equal annual or semiannual installments for a period of years equal to that which the bonds issued to pay for the improvement run, with interest upon the whole unpaid sum at a rate fixed by ordinance, or in equal level annual or semiannual installments of principal and interest thereon at a rate fixed by ordinance for a period of years equal to that period for which the bonds to pay for the improvements were issued.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 377; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-377; W.S. 1977, §

15-6-433

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; ch. 48, § 1; 1981, ch. 154, § 1; 1983, ch. 168, § 1.